Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2674.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-106, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-106. Death of convicted defendant; dismissal of appellate and postconviction proceedings and defendant's sentence A. On a convicted defendant's death, the court: 1. Shall dismiss any pending appeal or postconviction proceeding. 2. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, may dismiss all requirements of the defendant's sentence. B. A convicted defendant's death does not abate the defendant's criminal conviction or sentence of imprisonment or any restitution, fine or assessment imposed by the sentencing court.  END_STATUTE